Illinois, session 104th, HB1738.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Liquor Control Act of 1934 is amended by 5adding Section 6-40 as follows: 6    (235 ILCS 5/6-40 new)7    Sec. 6-40. Drug testing devices.8    (a) In this Section:9    "Bar" means a retail licensed establishment that is 10devoted to the serving of alcoholic beverages for consumption 11by guests on the premises and that derives no more than 10% of 12its gross revenue from the sale of food consumed on the 13premises. "Bar" includes, but is not limited to, taverns, 14nightclubs, cocktail lounges, adult entertainment facilities, 15and cabarets.16    "Controlled substances" includes, but is not limited to, 17flunitrazepam, ketamine, and gamma hydroxybutyric acid, also 18known by other names, including GHB, gamma hydroxybutyrate, 194-hydroxybutyrate, 4-hydroxybutanoic acid, sodium oxybate, and 20sodium oxybutyrate.21    "Drug testing devices" means test strips, stickers, 22straws, and other devices designed to detect the presence of 23controlled substances in a drink.  HB1738- 2 -LRB104 06644 BDA 16680 b1    (b) A bar shall offer for sale to the bar's customers drug 2testing devices at a cost not to exceed a reasonable amount 3based on the wholesale cost of the devices. This subsection 4does not prevent a bar from offering drug testing devices to 5customers free of charge.6    A bar shall post the following notice in a conspicuous 7location: "Don't get roofied! Drink spiking drug test kits 8available here. Ask a staff member for details.".9    (c) The owner or owners of a bar shall not be held liable, 10either criminally or civilly, for a defective test or 11inaccurate test result, including a false positive or false 12negative test result.13    (d) The owner or owners of a bar shall ensure that all drug 14testing devices offered to customers have not exceeded their 15expiration date or recommended period of use, according to the 16product label or product packaging or as otherwise recommended 17by the manufacturer.18    (e) The State Commission shall post on its website 19information about the requirements of this Section, including, 20but not limited to, the signage that is required to be posted 21and the types of drug testing devices that are required to be 22available. The State Commission shall adopt rules to implement 23the requirements of this Section.